Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 5. Forestry Services for Landowners.

§ 10.1-1131.
Authority of State Forester.

The State Forester is authorized to designate, upon request of the landowner, forest trees of private forest landowners for sale or removal, by blazing or otherwise, and to measure or estimate the volume of the trees under the terms and conditions hereinafter provided.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-51; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1132.
Administration by State Forester; services rendered.

The State Forester shall administer the provisions of this article. The State Forester, or his authorized agent, upon receipt of a request from a forest landowner for technical forestry assistance or service, may (i) designate forest trees for removal for lumber, veneer, poles, piling, pulpwood, cordwood, ties, or other forest products, by blazing, spotting with paint, or otherwise designating in an approved manner; (ii) measure or estimate the commercial volume contained in the trees designated; (iii) furnish the forest landowner with a statement of the volume of the trees so designated and estimated; and (iv) offer general forestry advice concerning the management of the landowner’s forest.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-52; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1133.
Fees for services; free services.

Upon presentation of a statement for designating, measuring or estimating services specified in §

10.1-1132

, the landowner or his agent shall pay to the State Forester within thirty days of receipt of the statement an amount not to exceed five percent of the sale price or fair market value of the stumpage so designated, measured or estimated. However, for the purpose of further encouraging the use of approved scientific forestry principles on the private forestlands of this Commonwealth, and to permit explanation of the application of such principles, the State Forester may, where he deems it advisable, designate, measure or estimate without charge the trees of a forest landowner on an area not in excess of ten acres.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-53; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1134.
Disposition of fees.

All moneys paid to the State Forester for services described in this article shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the Forestry Operations Fund, to be used to provide additional similar scientific forestry services to the landowners of this Commonwealth. The State Forester is hereby authorized to utilize any unobligated balances in the fire suppression fund for the purpose of acquiring replacement equipment for forestry management and protection operations.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-54; 1984, c. 715; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.